nhi.foma
define Cons [b | c | c h | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | x | z ] ;
define Vowels [a | e | i | o | u ] ;

define SuffixFlags ["@U.suff.li@" | "@U.suff.tli@" | "@U.suff.other@" | "@U.suff.tl@"] ;
define PossFlags ["@U.pos.1SG@" | "@U.pos.2SG@" | "@U.pos.3SG@" | "@U.pos.ON@"] ;

!
! The FlagDiacritics are the flag diacritics used for long-distance agreement.
!
define AllFlagDiacritics ["@U.pos.1SG@" | "@U.pos.2SG@" | "@U.pos.3SG@" |
                          "@U.pos.ON@" | "@U.pos.OFF@" | "@U.suff.li@" |
                          "@U.suff.tli@" | "@U.suff.other@" | "@U.suff.tl@" |
                          "@U.PlSubj.ON@" | "@U.PlSubj.OFF@" | "@U.Past.ON@" |
                          "@U.Past.OFF@" | "@U.Trans.ON@" | "@U.Trans.OFF@" |
                          "@P.2ndPersAddr.ON@" | "@R.2ndPersAddr.ON@" |
                          "@D.2ndPersAddr.ON@" | "@P.Reflexive.ON@" |
                          "@R.Reflexive@" | "@D.Optative.ON@" ] ;

!
! FlagMarkers are the flag diacritics used simply to mark morpheme types,
! since certain phonological processes are easier to model as functions of
! specific morphemes (and the honorific vowel harmony requires it).
!
define FlagMarkers ["@P.Hon.ON@"| "@P.SubjPref.ON@" | "@P.ObjPref.ON@"] ;

!
! NNC Rules
!
define NasalAssimilation n -> 0 || _ SuffixFlags "@U.pos.OFF@" "^" m ;
define DeleteIAfterReflexiveO i -> 0 || o "^" SuffixFlags _ Cons Cons ;
define Nelision n -> 0 || _ "@U.pos.ON@" "^" h u a n ;
define PossessiveNasalAssimilation m -> n || "@U.pos.ON@" i _ "^" SuffixFlags [c | t | n | s | y] ;
define PossVEnding a -> a u h, o -> o u h, i -> i u h, e -> e u h || _ PossFlags "^" 0 .#. ;
define WrewritePt1 W -> u h  || _ AllFlagDiacritics*  "^" .#. ;
define WrewritePt2 W -> h u i || _ AllFlagDiacritics* "^" t l .#. ;

!
! VNC Rules
!
!
define SubjIEpenthesis n -> n i, t -> t i, x -> x i || "@P.SubjPref.ON@" _ "^" [ AllFlagDiacritics | FlagMarkers ]* [Cons|K] ;
define ObjIEpenthesis K -> K i || [ .#. | Cons ] [AllFlagDiacritics | FlagMarkers | "^"]*  _ "^" [ AllFlagDiacritics | FlagMarkers ]* Cons ;

define HonorificVowelHarmonyPt1 i -> o || m _ t z [AllFlagDiacritics|"^"]* "@P.Hon.ON@" o n ;
define HonorificVowelHarmonyPt2 i -> o || K _ (m) [AllFlagDiacritics|"^"]* "@P.Hon.ON@" o n ;
define HonorificVowelHarmonyPt3 i -> o || [n | t | x] _ [ AllFlagDiacritics|"^" | m o t z | K o m | K | "@P.SubjPref.ON@" | "@P.ObjPref.ON@" ]* "@P.Hon.ON@" o n ;

define ODegemination o -> 0 || o "^" [ AllFlagDiacritics | FlagMarkers ]* _ n ;
define KDegemination1 K -> 0 || [K|c|q] [ AllFlagDiacritics | FlagMarkers | "^" ]* _ ;
define KDegemination2 K -> 0 || _ [ AllFlagDiacritics | FlagMarkers | "^" ]* [K|c|q] ;

define StoZRewrite s -> z || _ AllFlagDiacritics* [ Cons | a | o | .#. ] ;
define StoCRewrite s -> c ;

define PluralEndingPt1 P L -> h || a "^" AllFlagDiacritics* _ .#.;
define PluralEndingPt2 P L -> h u a || o "^" AllFlagDiacritics* _ .#.;
define PluralEndingPt3 i -> e || _ "^" AllFlagDiacritics* P L .#.;
define PluralEndingPt4 P L -> 0 || _ .#.;

define NasalAssimilation m -> n || _ "^" AllFlagDiacritics* [K|t|n] ;

define KElision K -> 0 || Cons "^" AllFlagDiacritics* _ .#. ;
define KtoQui K -> q u || _  ("^") AllFlagDiacritics* [i|e] ;
define KtoC K -> c ;

define IhToEPreterite i h -> e || _ "^" AllFlagDiacritics* .#. ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

read lexc nhi_vnc.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Grammar Lexicon                      .o.
               SubjIEpenthesis              .o.
               ObjIEpenthesis               .o.
               HonorificVowelHarmonyPt1     .o.
               HonorificVowelHarmonyPt2     .o.
               HonorificVowelHarmonyPt3     .o.
               ODegemination                .o.
               KDegemination1               .o.
               KDegemination2               .o.
               StoZRewrite                  .o.
               PluralEndingPt1              .o.
               PluralEndingPt2              .o.
               PluralEndingPt3              .o.
               PluralEndingPt4              .o.
               NasalAssimilation            .o.
               KElision                     .o.
               IhToEPreterite               .o.
               KtoQui                       .o.
               KtoC                         .o.
               Cleanup ;


!
! The following rule sequence is used for NNCs
!
!define Grammar Lexicon                     .o.
!               DeleteIAfterReflexiveO      .o.
!               NasalAssimilation           .o.
!               PossessiveNasalAssimilation .o.
!               PossVEnding                 .o.
!               Nelision                    .o.
!               WrewritePt1                 .o.
!               WrewritePt2                 .o.
!               Cleanup ;

regex Grammar;
